Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 6. Voluntary Acknowledgment of Paternity

§ 14-2-601.
Acknowledgment of paternity.

The mother of a child and a man claiming to be the genetic father of the child may sign an acknowledgment of paternity with intent to establish the man’s paternity.

An acknowledgment of paternity of a child born in Wyoming may be filed with the state office of vital records.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-602.
Execution of acknowledgment of paternity.

An acknowledgment of paternity shall:

Be in a record;

Be signed, or otherwise authenticated, under penalty for false swearing by the mother and by the man seeking to establish his paternity;

State that the child whose paternity is being acknowledged:

Does not have a presumed father, or has a presumed father whose full name is stated; and

Does not have another acknowledged or adjudicated father.

State whether there has been genetic testing and, if so, that the acknowledging man’s claim of paternity is consistent with the results of the testing; and

State that the signatories understand that the acknowledgment is the equivalent of a judicial adjudication of paternity of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred after two (2) years.

An acknowledgment of paternity is void if it:

States that another man is a presumed father, unless a denial of paternity signed or otherwise authenticated by the presumed father or a court order rebutting the presumption is filed with the state office of vital records;

States that another man is an acknowledged or adjudicated father; or

Falsely denies the existence of a presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father of the child.

A presumed father may sign or otherwise authenticate an acknowledgment of paternity.

Before a mother and a man claiming to be the genetic father of a child can sign an acknowledgment of paternity affidavit, the mother and the alleged father shall be provided notice orally or through use of video or audio equipment and in writing of the alternatives to, the legal consequences of, and the rights and responsibilities that arise from, signing the acknowledgment of paternity affidavit. If either the mother or the alleged father is a minor, any rights that attach as a result of the status as a minor shall also be provided orally or through the use of video or audio equipment and in writing, in addition to any other requirements of this subsection.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1; 2004, ch. 10, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (d).

§ 14-2-603.
Denial of paternity.

A presumed father may sign a denial of his paternity. The denial is valid only if:

An acknowledgment of paternity signed, or otherwise authenticated, by another man is filed pursuant to W.S.

14-2-605

;

The denial is in a record, and is signed, or otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury; and

The presumed father has not previously:

Acknowledged his paternity, unless the previous acknowledgment has been rescinded pursuant to W.S.

14-2-607

or successfully challenged pursuant to W.S.

14-2-608

; or

Been adjudicated to be the father of the child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-604.
Rules for acknowledgment and denial of paternity.

An acknowledgment of paternity and a denial of paternity may be contained in a single document or may be signed in counterparts, and may be filed separately or simultaneously. If the acknowledgement and denial are both necessary, neither is valid until both are filed.

An acknowledgment of paternity or a denial of paternity may be signed before the birth of the child.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity takes effect on the birth of the child or the filing of the document with the state office of vital records, whichever occurs later.

An acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity signed by a minor and a legal guardian of the minor is valid if it is otherwise in compliance with this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-605.
Effect of acknowledgment or denial of paternity.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

14-2-607

and

14-2-608

, a valid acknowledgment of paternity filed with the state office of vital records is equivalent to an adjudication of paternity of a child and confers upon the acknowledged father all of the rights and duties of a parent.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

14-2-607

and

14-2-608

, a valid denial of paternity by a presumed father filed with the state office of vital records in conjunction with a valid acknowledgment of paternity is equivalent to an adjudication of the nonpaternity of the presumed father and discharges the presumed father from all rights and duties of a parent.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Enforcement of Civil Liability for Nonsupport in the State of Wyoming,” see VIII Wyo. L.J. 227 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of putative father's promise to support or provide for illegitimate child, 20 A.L.R.3d 500 (2009).

§ 14-2-606.
No filing fee.

The state office of vital records shall not charge for filing an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-607.
Proceeding for rescission.

A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity by commencing a proceeding to rescind before the earlier of:

Sixty (60) days after the effective date of the acknowledgment or denial, as provided in W.S.

14-2-604

; or

The date of the first hearing in a proceeding to which the signatory is a party before a court to adjudicate an issue relating to the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-608.
Challenge after expiration of period for rescission.

After the period for rescission under W.S.

14-2-607

has expired, a signatory of an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may commence a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial only:

On the basis of fraud, duress or material mistake of fact; and

Within two (2) years after the acknowledgment or denial is filed with the state office of vital records.

A party challenging an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity has the burden of proof.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-609.
Procedure for rescission or challenge.

Every signatory to an acknowledgment of paternity and any related denial of paternity shall be made a party to a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial.

For the purpose of rescission of, or challenge to, an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction of this state by signing the acknowledgment or denial, effective upon the filing of the document with the state office of vital records.

Except for good cause shown, during the pendency of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, the court may not suspend the legal responsibilities of a signatory arising from the acknowledgment, including the duty to pay child support.

A proceeding to rescind or to challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity shall be conducted in the same manner as a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under article 8 of this act.

At the conclusion of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, the court shall order the state office of vital records to amend the birth record of the child, if appropriate.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-610.
Ratification barred.

A court or administrative agency conducting a judicial or administrative proceeding is not required or permitted to ratify an unchallenged acknowledgment of paternity.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-611.
Full faith and credit.

A court of this state shall give full faith and credit to an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity effective in another state if the acknowledgment or denial has been signed and is otherwise in compliance with the law of the other state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-612.
Forms for acknowledgment and denial of paternity.

To facilitate compliance with this article, the state office of vital records shall prescribe forms for the acknowledgment of paternity and the denial of paternity.

A valid acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity is not affected by a later modification of the prescribed form.

Every hospital or birthing center located in the state shall provide to any person who holds himself out to be the natural parent of a child born in the state an affidavit of paternity pursuant to this act. The facility providing the affidavit shall forward the completed affidavit to the state office of vital records. Upon request, the state office of vital records shall provide blank affidavits of paternity to any facility making the request under this subsection.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-613.
Release of information.

The state office of vital records may release information relating to the acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity to a signatory of the acknowledgment or denial, to courts and to the Title IV-D agency of this or another state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-614.
Adoption of rules.

The state office of vital records may adopt rules to implement this article.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.